District of Columbia statutes.
16-2357

Notice.

(a)

When a motion to terminate the parent and child relationship is filed, a judge shall promptly set a time for an adjudicatory hearing and shall cause notice thereof to be given to all parties.

(b)

A judge shall direct the issuance to and personal service upon the child’s parent of a summons together with a copy of the motion to terminate the parent and child relationship.

(c)

When it is appropriate to the proper disposition of the case, a judge may direct the service of a summons upon other persons.

(d)

If a personal service under this section cannot be effected, then notice shall be made constructively pursuant to rules of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 410, 24 DCR 3341
This section is referenced in § 16-4603.09.
1981 Ed., § 16-2357.
1973 Ed., § 16-2357.